Missouri, session 2026, SB1029.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.821, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
162.192 and 162.821, to read as follows:
162.192. 1. For purposes of this section, "financial
ledger" means a searchable, machine-readable, publicly
accessible database maintained by a school district that:
(1) Sets forth all financial transactions conducted
with school district funds, including, but not limited to,
the school funds established pursuant to section 165.011;
(2) Is available without login credentials,
registration, or fees;
(3) Is downloadable and exportable in formats
including, but not limited to, comma-separated values (CSV)
format and Microsoft Excel format;
(4) Records all transactions using Missouri financial
accounting manual classification categories, as applicable;
and
(5) Includes the following minimum required data
fields for each financial transaction, and is searchable and
filterable by such fields, at minimum:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 1029 2
(a) Transaction date;
(b) Transaction amount;
(c) Revenue or expenditure designation;
(d) Fund code;
(e) Function code;
(f) Object code;
(g) Vendor or payee name; and
(h) Description or memo field.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, each school district shall maintain a financial
ledger on its publicly accessible website. The homepage of
each public school's website shall include a direct link to
the financial ledger of the school district that has
oversight responsibility for that public school. The link
shall make the financial ledger accessible within one click,
shall be clearly labeled as a link to the school district's
financial ledger, and shall be functional and mobile-
responsive. The department may provide standardized
language or icons that public schools may use for the
purpose of ensuring compliance with this subsection.
3. A school district's financial ledger shall be
updated at least monthly. Details of each calendar month's
financial transactions shall be posted no later than forty-
five days after the close of that calendar month.
4. For historical record keeping purposes, a school
district shall maintain complete financial ledger data on
its publicly accessible website for no fewer than five prior
fiscal years.
5. A school district may redact protected personal
information on the financial ledger only to the extent
required by applicable law. Vendor names, amounts, and
accounting codes shall not be redacted. Payroll data may be

SCS SB 1029 3
presented in aggregated form where disclosure of individual
information is restricted.
6. Debt obligations shall be posted in a separate
section of the financial ledger, with disclosure of the
following information:
(1) Outstanding debt balances;
(2) Issuance dates;
(3) Repayment schedules;
(4) Annual debt service amounts; and
(5) Debt service as a percentage of total expenditures.
7. The department may provide or approve standardized
templates or platforms a school district may use to comply
with the provisions of this section. A school district may
use a third-party template or platform that is approved by
the department.
8. The department may provide guidance to assist
school districts in complying with the provisions of this
section. Such guidance may include:
(1) High-level expenditure summaries by classification
category under the Missouri financial accounting manual;
(2) Standardized definitions of terms to be used in
the financial ledger; and
(3) Clear explanations of methodology and limitations
applicable to the compilation and presentation of financial
ledger data.
9. School districts shall annually certify compliance
with this section to the department. The department shall
promulgate rules establishing procedures and timelines for
school districts to certify compliance.
10. If the department finds that any school district
has violated a provision of this section, the department may
withhold state aid to which the school district is entitled

SCS SB 1029 4
under chapter 163 until the school district proves to the
satisfaction of the department that the school district is
no longer in violation of this section.
11. The department shall establish a process for
members of the public to file complaints with the department
if they believe a school district has violated any provision
of this section. The department may establish a public
compliance dashboard on the department's website to enable
members of the public to check whether a particular school
district is certified as in compliance with the provisions
of this section.
12. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
100 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
101 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
102 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
103 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
104 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
105 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
162.821. The district secretary shall keep a record of
the proceedings of all annual and special elections of the
voters of the district and of the proceedings of the board
of education. He shall make copies of the election notices,
contracts with teachers, certificates and all other papers
relating to the business of the district, and securely keep
the same. He shall maintain a correct plat of the district
and shall promptly notify the department of elementary and

SCS SB 1029 5
secondary education and the county clerk of each county
affected of all changes in the boundaries of the district.
He shall transmit to the county commission and to the state
department of elementary and secondary education, on or
before the fifteenth day of August in each year, a report
embracing the following items:
(1) The number of children, male and female, attending
the public schools during the year;
(2) Total number of days' attendance by all such
children;
(3) The number of days the public schools of the
district have been maintained during the school year;
(4) The number of teachers employed, male and female,
and the wages per month of each;
(5) Estimated value of school property owned and
managed by the district;
(6) Assessed valuation of the district;
(7) Rate of school tax on the assessed valuation of
the district;
(8) Cash on hand at the beginning of the year;
(9) Tuition fees received and credited to the
teachers' fund of the district;
(10) Public funds received by county treasurer;
(11) District tax received by county (or township)
treasurer;
(12) Amount paid on teachers' wages;
(13) Amount paid for incidental expenses;
(14) Amount expended for purchasing site, erecting
schoolhouses, rent and repairs;
(15) Amount expended in cancelling bonded indebtedness
and paying interest on same;
(16) Amount expended for library;

SCS SB 1029 6
(17) Amount expended for legal services. If the
report does not include the amount expended for legal
services, then the attorney general may investigate the
violation of this subdivision and may bring a civil action,
including an action for injunctive relief, against the
school district. Such action shall be brought in the county
where the school district is located;
(18) Cash on hand at the end of the year;
[(18)] (19) Such other information as may be required
by the state board of education.
✓